Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5048.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-130. Special plate for Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight Hub.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor
Flight Hub. The plates shall be designed to reference the not-for-profit Rhode Island Fire Chiefs
Honor Flight Hub.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight Hub motor vehicle plates shall be the same size
as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight
Hub, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode
Island state police.
(d) The Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight Hub plates shall be subject to compliance
with § 31-3-117 relating to the number of minimum pre-paid order of plates per plate type (i.e.

passenger, commercial, etc.) and any required payment. The Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight
Hub plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order
will be handled by the Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight Hub and shall not be submitted to
the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the
proper paper work submitted to the division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures, and any
other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Rhode Island Fire
Chiefs Honor Flight Hub plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.
(g) The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight Hub in furtherance of its
mission of "honoring our veterans by offering WWII and Korean War Veterans a no-cost trip to
visit the memorials in Washington, DC."
(h) A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to the Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight Hub.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of the Rhode Island Fire
Chiefs Honor Flight Hub plates, the Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight Hub must use any
Rhode Island sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.
(j) Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor Flight Hub will be required to submit an annual
accounting report before such monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Rhode Island Fire Chiefs Honor
Flight Hub plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect six (6) months after passage.
========
LC000039
========
LC000039 - Page 2 of 3